District of Columbia statutes.
8-103.11

Water quality management plan.

(a)

The Mayor shall establish a water quality management plan according with which activities regulated under this subchapter shall comply.

(b)

The plan should include pollution control alternatives, evaluation of the attainment of the water quality standards, the population affected, the costs of implementing the plan, the designation of agencies to implement the various portions of the plan, and the benefits of implementing the plan.

(c)

The plan shall be reviewed periodically.

(d)

The Mayor may certify that water quality management plans from the state, the local, or the federal government are acceptable.

(e)

The Mayor shall review environmental impact statements and assessments, feasibility studies, facility plans, and other proposals in order to determine if the activity conforms with the water quality management plans of the District.

Mar. 16, 1985, D.C. Law 5-188, § 12, 32 DCR 919
1981 Ed., § 6-931.